Illinois, session 104th, HB2132.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 65-20 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/65-20)7    Sec. 65-20. Road district treasurer; new township; 8multi-township officers.9    (a) Compensation of township officers shall be set by the 10the township board at least 180 days before the beginning of 11the terms of officers, including compensation of the road 12district treasurer, which shall be not less than $100 or more 13than $1,000 per year. Compensation of a township assessor and 14collector shall be set at the same time as the compensation of 15the township supervisor. Compensation of a multi-township 16assessor shall be set at least 150 days before his or her 17election.18    (b) The compensation to be paid to each officer in a new 19township established under Section 10-25 shall be determined 20under this Section by the township board of the township the 21whole or a part of which comprises the new township and that 22has the highest equalized assessed valuation (as of December 2331, 1972) of the old townships that comprise the new township.  HB2132- 2 -LRB104 11599 RTM 21688 b1    (c) At least 150 days before the election of 2multi-township officers, the multi-township board may 3establish additional pay of those board members for their 4services in an amount not to exceed $25 per day for each day of 5services.6    (d) For the first term of a township consolidated or 7merged under Article 22 or 23, compensation for township 8officers of the consolidated or merged township shall be set 9by the Transition Township Board no later than the first day in 10April before the consolidated election at which the township 11officers are to be elected. 12(Source: P.A. 100-107, eff. 1-1-18.)